North Carolina, session 2025, HB141.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the "Joe John Remembrance Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.7. Fees for special registration plates and distribution of the fees.
…
(a1) Fees. – All other special registration plates are subject to the regular motor vehicle
registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the following amount:

Special Plate Additional Fee Amount
…
Ex-Prisoner of War None
Fire Department or Rescue Squad Member None
Gold Star Lapel Button None
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to special
registration plates issued or renewed on or after that date.
*H141-v-1*